Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3403
Active candidate, defined.

Active candidate means an
individual who has (1) met the requirements established by the national genetic
counseling board to take the national certification examination in general
genetics or genetic counseling and (2) been granted active candidate status
by the national genetic counseling board.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 3.